Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-385
Release of confidential information; penalty.

Any person who knowingly releases information required to be kept confidential by the Adult Protective Services Act, except as provided in the act, shall be guilty of a Class III misdemeanor.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 38.